Colorado statutes. TITLE 32 Special Districts
PART 6 SPECIAL ASSESSMENTS
32-11-629. Permissive additional security.

In addition to the additional security provided for in section 32-11-628, and not in limitation thereof, the urban district may further additionally secure the payment of assessment debentures and assessment bonds pertaining to any improvement district, both as to principal and interest, as may be provided in accordance with this section.

In consideration of general benefits conferred on the urban district at large from the acquisition by construction, or otherwise, of local improvements, the urban district, prior to the issuance of any assessment debentures or assessment bonds pertaining to any improvement district in this article, may contract by resolution with the holders thereof that the payment of such securities pertaining to the improvement district, both as to principal and interest, as the same become due, is additionally secured by a pledge of moneys in a special fund or special account created therefor into which the urban district covenants to deposit the proceeds of general (ad valorem) property taxes to be levied not earlier than the date of the debentures or bonds of any such series nor later than two years after the maturity date thereof or last maturity date of any serial bonds of any issue, not exceeding in any one year in the aggregate for all improvement districts the limitation pertaining to assessment bonds in section 32-11-217 (1)(d). After the issuance of any such securities, the urban district shall levy such general (ad valorem) taxes pursuant to such contract; but any such levy shall be diminished to the extent other funds of the urban district available therefor are appropriated to and deposited in such fund or account.

Prior to the redemption of all such securities, including both principal and interest, the proceeds of such taxes and any moneys deposited in such fund or account in lieu of such taxes shall be disbursed from the fund or account only for the payment of the principal of and interest on the securities, and any prior redemption premium pertaining thereto. After the securities have been redeemed in full, any moneys remaining in the fund or account and pertaining only to the improvement district shall be deposited in the surplus and deficiency fund.

Securities of the urban district pertaining to any improvement district payable from assessments, which payment shall be additionally secured as provided in section 32-11-628, or in both that section and this section, as the board may determine, shall not be subject to the debt limitation nor exhaust the debt incurring power of the urban district, nor shall such securities be required to be authorized at any election. Such securities shall not be held to constitute a prohibited lending of credit or donation nor to contravene any constitutional or statutory limitation or restriction.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 796, § 142.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-21-142.

32-11-630. Redemption of securities.

Whenever considered advisable by the treasurer, he may, and whenever funds may be in his hands to the credit of any improvement district exceeding the amount of interest on the unpaid principal becoming due on and prior to one year next after the last interest payment date, and, if maturing serially, the principal becoming due on the next principal payment date, he shall, subject to the provisions concerning the payment of assessment debentures and assessment bonds pertaining to an improvement district prior to maturity in the securities and in any resolution pertaining to their issuance, by publication at least once not less than fifteen days prior to the redemption date, call in a suitable number of securities of the improvement district for payment, for the principal amount thereof, accrued interest to the redemption date, and any prior redemption premium due thereon.

After the redemption date so designated, interest on the securities so called shall cease. The urban district, however, may provide that such securities be redeemed only on interest payment dates.

The notice shall specify the securities so called by number, and all such securities shall be paid in the order designated in any such resolution.

The holder of any such securities may at any time furnish his post-office address to the treasurer, and in such case a copy of such advertisement shall be mailed by the treasurer to the holder of the securities called at such address within three days of the date of such publication.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 797, § 143.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-21-143.

32-11-631. Rights and powers of security holders.

Subject to any contractual limitations binding upon the holders of any issue or series of assessment debentures or assessment bonds or the trustee therefor, including but not limited to the restriction of the exercise of any remedy to a specified proportion, percentage, or number of such holders, any holder of such securities or trustee therefor has the right and power for the equal benefit and protection of all holders of the securities similarly situated:

By mandamus or by other suit, action, or proceeding at law or in equity to enforce his rights against the urban district, the board, and any other of the officers, agents, and employees of the district, and to require and to compel the district, the board, or any such officers, agents, or employees to perform and to carry out their respective duties, obligations, or other commitments under this article and under their respective covenants and agreements with the holder of such securities;

By action or by suit in equity to require the urban district to account as if it is the trustee of an express trust;

By action or by suit in equity to have appointed a receiver, which receiver may take possession of any accounts and may collect, receive, and apply all assessments, other revenues, and other moneys pledged for the payment of the securities in the same manner as the urban district itself might do in accordance with the obligations of the district; and

By action or by suit in equity to enjoin any acts or things which might be unlawful or in violation of the rights of the holder of any such securities and to bring suit thereupon.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 797, § 144.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-21-144.

32-11-632. Statement of cost of project.

Upon the completion of any project in any improvement district or, in the case of assessment units or sewers, upon completion from time to time of an improvement program in any assessment unit or any parts of sewers affording complete drainage for any part of the improvement district, or after the determination of the net cost to the urban district, and upon the acceptance thereof by the board, or whenever the total cost of such project or any of such part of sewers can be definitely ascertained, and upon the board's determination to assess all or a part of the cost thereof, the engineer shall prepare and shall furnish to the board a statement showing the total cost of the project or of any such part thereof.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 798, § 145.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-21-145.

32-11-633. Order for assessment roll and its form.

Following the furnishing of the statement of the cost of the project, the board by resolution shall:

Determine the cost of the project to be paid by the assessable property in the improvement district;

Order the engineer to make out an assessment roll containing, among other things:

The name of each last-known owner of each tract to be assessed or, if not known, that the name is unknown; and

A description of each tract to be assessed and the amount of the proposed assessment thereon, apportioned upon the basis for assessments stated in the provisional order for the hearing on the project;

Cause a copy of the resolution to be furnished by the secretary to the engineer.

In fixing the amount or the sum of money that may be required to pay the cost of the project, the board need not necessarily be governed by the estimates of such cost provided for in this article, but the board may fix such other sum within the limits prescribed as it may deem necessary to cover the cost of the project.

If by mistake or otherwise any person is improperly designated in the assessment roll as the owner of any tract or if the same is assessed without the name of the owner or in the name of a person other than the owner, such assessment shall not for that reason be vitiated, but it shall in all respects be as valid upon and against such tract as though assessed in the name of the owner thereof. When the assessment roll has been confirmed, such assessment shall become a lien on such tract and shall be collected as provided by law.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 798, § 146.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-21-146.

32-11-634. Assessment computations and limitations.

If the assessment is made upon the basis of frontage, the engineer shall assess each tract with such relative portion of the whole amount to be levied as the length of front of such premises bears to the whole frontage of all the tracts to be assessed, and the frontage of all tracts to be assessed shall be deemed to be the aggregate number of feet as determined for assessment by the engineer.

If the assessment is directed to be according to an area or zone or another equitable basis other than a front-foot basis, the engineer shall assess upon each tract such relative portion of the whole sum to be levied as is proportionate to the estimated benefit according to such basis.

Regardless of the basis used, in cases of wedge-shaped or V-shaped or any other irregular-shaped tracts, an amount apportioned thereto shall be in proportion to the special benefits thereby derived.

No assessment shall exceed the amount of the estimate of maximum special benefits to the tract assessed, as provided in section 32-11-607 (2).

Any amount which would be assessed against any tract in the absence of both limitations in subsections (3) and (4) of this section shall be defrayed by other than the levy of assessments.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 799, § 147.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-21-147.

32-11-635. Determination of assessable tracts.

The board shall determine what amount or part of every expense shall be charged as an assessment and the tracts upon which the same shall be levied, and as often as the board deems it expedient, it shall require all of the several tracts chargeable therewith respectively to be reported by the secretary to the engineer for assessment.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 799, § 148.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-21-148.

32-11-636. Preparation of proposed roll.

Upon receiving the report mentioned in section 32-11-633, the engineer shall make an assessment roll and state a proposed assessment therein upon each tract so reported to him, and by such proposed assessments he shall defray the whole amount of all charges so directed to be levied upon each of such tracts respectively. When completed, he shall report the assessment roll to the board.

When any assessment is reported by the engineer to the board as directed in this section, the same shall be filed in the office of the secretary and numbered.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 799, § 149.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-21-149.

32-11-637. Notice of assessment hearing.

Upon receiving the assessment roll, the board, by resolution, shall:

Fix a time and a place when and where complaints, protests, and objections that may be made in writing or verbally concerning the same by the owner of any tract or by any person interested may be heard; and

Order the secretary to give notice of the hearing.

The secretary shall give notice by publication and by mail of the time and the place of such hearing, which notice shall also state:

That the assessment roll is on file in his office;

The date of filing the same;

The time and the place when and where the board will hear all complaints, protests, or objections that may be made in writing or verbally to the assessment roll and to the proposed assessments by the parties thereby aggrieved; and

That any complaint, protest, or objection to the regularity, validity, and correctness of the proceedings, of the assessment roll, of each assessment contained therein, and of the amount thereof levied on each tract shall be deemed waived unless filed in writing on specific grounds with the secretary at least three days prior to the assessment hearing.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 799, § 150.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-21-150.

32-11-638. Assessment hearing.

At the time and the place so designated, the board shall hear and shall determine any written complaint, protest, or objection filed as provided in section 32-11-637, any verbal views expressed in respect to the proposed assessments, the assessment roll, or the assessment procedure, and the board may adjourn the hearing from time to time.

The board by resolution has the power in its discretion to revise, correct, confirm, or set aside any assessment and to order that such assessment be made de novo.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 800, § 151.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-21-151.

32-11-639. Levy of assessments.

After the assessment roll is in final form and is so confirmed by resolution, the urban district by the same or by a supplemental resolution shall by reference to such assessment roll as so modified, if modified, and as confirmed by such resolution, levy the assessments in the roll.

The board shall cause the resolution levying the assessments to be published at least one time in a newspaper of general circulation in the improvement district.

No assessment shall be levied for any capital improvements acquired by the urban district and located or to be located on any land until the board by the adoption of such resolution or otherwise determines that the district has the right to possession of such land or an interest therein for the purpose of acquiring the improvements.

Such decision and resolution shall be a final determination of the regularity, validity, and correctness of the proceedings, of the assessment plat, of the assessment roll, of each assessment contained therein, and of the amount thereof levied on each tract.

Such determination by the board shall be conclusive upon the owners of the property assessed.

The roll shall be prima facie evidence in all courts and tribunals of the regularity of all proceedings preliminary to the making thereof and of the validity of the assessments and the assessment roll.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 800, § 152.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-21-152.

32-11-640. Appeal of adverse determination.

Within the fifteen days immediately succeeding the publication of the assessment resolution, any person who has filed a complaint, protest, or objection on specific grounds in writing, as provided in this article, has the right to commence an action or a suit in any court of competent jurisdiction to correct or to set aside such determination.

Thereafter all actions or suits attacking the regularity, validity, and correctness of the proceedings of the assessment plat, of the assessment roll, of each assessment contained therein, and the amount thereof levied on each tract, including without limitation the defense of confiscation, shall be perpetually barred.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 800, § 153.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-21-153.

32-11-641. Transfer of roll to county treasurer.

Upon the expiration of such fifteen-day period for any such appeal, the secretary shall forthwith note on the assessment roll or by separate instrument each assessment, if any, the regularity, validity, or correctness of which is challenged in such an action or suit.

Thereupon the secretary shall forthwith certify under the seal of the urban district and transmit to the county treasurer of each county in which the improvement district is located, wholly or in part, the assessment roll with the assessment resolution, with a notation of any pending legal actions and suits and with the secretary's warrant for the collection of the assessments levied against the assessable property within the county. The county treasurer shall receipt for the same and all such rolls shall be numbered for convenient reference.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 801, § 154.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-21-154.

32-11-642. Thirty-day payment period - deferred payments.

All assessments made in pursuance of the assessment resolution shall be due and payable without demand not earlier than thirty-one days after its publication upon its final passage and within sixty days after such publication.

Each such assessment or any part thereof may at the election of the owner be paid in installments with interest as provided in this article, whenever the board so authorizes the payment of assessments.

Failure to pay the whole assessment within such period of thirty days shall be conclusively considered an election on the part of all persons interested, whether under disability or otherwise, to pay in installments the amount of the assessment then unpaid.

All persons so electing to pay in installments shall be conclusively considered as consenting to the project for which each such assessment was levied, and such election shall be conclusively considered as a waiver of all rights to question the power of jurisdiction of the urban district to acquire or improve, or acquire and improve, the project, the quality of the work, the regularity or sufficiency of the proceedings, or the validity or the correctness of the assessment.

The owner of any tract assessed may at any time pay the whole unpaid principal and the interest accrued to the next interest payment date, together with penalties if any. The board may require in the assessment resolution the payment of a premium for any prepayment not exceeding seven percent of each installment of principal so prepaid.

Subject to the foregoing provisions, all installments, both of principal and interest, shall be payable at such times as may be determined in and by the assessment resolution.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 801, § 155.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-21-155.

32-11-643. Acceleration upon delinquency.

Failure to pay any installment, whether principal or interest, when due shall ipso facto cause the whole amount of the unpaid principal to become due and payable immediately at the option of the urban district, security holder, or trustee therefor initiating foreclosure proceedings, the exercise of such option to be indicated by the commencement of foreclosure proceedings for not only each delinquent installment but also all other unpaid installments of any assessment.

At any time prior to the day of sale, the owner may pay the amount of delinquent installments, with accrued interest, all penalties, and cost of collection accrued, including but not necessarily limited to any attorneys' fees, and shall thereupon be restored to the right thereafter to pay in installments in the same manner as if default had not been made.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 801, § 156.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-21-156.

32-11-644. Limitations upon deferred payments.

In case of such election to pay in installments, the assessment shall be payable in not less than two nor more than twenty substantially equal annual installments or not less than four nor more than forty substantially equal semiannual installments of principal.

Interest in all cases on the unpaid principal accruing from the date of publishing the assessment resolution upon its final passage until the respective installment due dates shall be payable annually or semiannually at a rate not exceeding eight percent per annum; except that, in the case of an assessment initiated subsequent to July 1, 1984, such interest shall not exceed the maximum rate fixed by the board in the notice of the provisional order hearing given pursuant to sections 32-11-608 and 32-11-609.

Nothing in this article shall limit the discretion of the board in determining whether assessments shall be payable in installments and the time the first installment of principal or of interest, or of both, and any subsequent installments thereof shall become due.

The board in the assessment resolution shall state the number of installments in which assessments may be paid, the period of payment, the rate of interest upon the unpaid installments of principal to their respective due dates, any privileges of making prepayments, and any premium to be paid to the urban district for exercising any such privilege, the rate of interest upon unpaid principal and accrued interest after any delinquency at the rate of one percent per month, or any fraction thereof, and any penalties and any collection costs payable after delinquency.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 802, § 157.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-21-157.

L. 84:

(2) amended, p. 847, § 3, effective July 1.

32-11-645. Assessment liens.

The payment of the amount so assessed, including each installment thereof, the interest thereon, and any penalties and collection costs shall be secured by an assessment lien upon the tract assessed from the date of publication of the assessment resolution.

Each such lien upon each tract assessed shall:

Be subordinate and junior to any lien thereon for any general (ad valorem) taxes, whether prior in time or not;

Be prior and superior to any assessment lien thereon subsequently levied by the urban district or by any public body;

Be subordinate and junior to any assessment lien thereon theretofore levied by the urban district or by any public body; and

Be prior and superior to all liens, claims, mortgages, other encumbrances, and titles other than the liens of assessments and general taxes.

All purchasers, mortgagees, or encumbrancers of any such tract shall hold the same subject to such lien so created, whether prior in time or not.

Each such assessment lien shall continue as to unpaid installments, principal, interest, and any penalties and costs until such assessments, the principal thereof, interest thereon, and any penalties and costs pertaining thereto shall be fully paid, unless terminated by the foreclosure of any prior and superior lien on the tract assessed.

But unmatured installments shall not be deemed to be within the terms of any general covenant or warranty.

No statute of limitations shall begin to run against any assessment or the assessment lien to secure its payment until after the last installment of principal thereof becomes due.

The urban district may use any available funds or moneys for the satisfaction of any lien prior in right to any special assessment lien created by the district.

In the resale of any property to which the urban district has so acquired title, the district shall use its best efforts to sell the property for an amount at least equal to the funds or moneys so used plus the amount necessary to satisfy the special assessment lien created by the district, including principal, interest, penalties, and collection costs.

The moneys received from such a resale in payment for the property shall be used first to satisfy such special assessment lien and thereafter to restore to the fund from which any such prior lien was satisfied and the moneys used therefor.

The urban district is authorized to acquire and to dispose of property on which there are delinquent taxes or assessments, or both.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 802, § 158.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-21-158.

32-11-646. Division of tract.

If any tract is divided after an assessment thereon has been levied and divided into installments and before the collection of all the installments, the board may require the county assessor to apportion the uncollected amounts upon the several parts of land so divided according to the proportions thereof based upon their valuation for assessment for taxes.

The report of such apportionment, when approved, shall be conclusive on all the parties, and all assessments thereafter made upon such tracts shall be according to such subdivision.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 803, § 159.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-21-159.

32-11-647. Surpluses and deficiencies.

If any assessment proves insufficient to pay for the project or the work for which it is levied and the expense incident thereto, the amount of such deficiency shall be paid from the capital improvements fund of the urban district or from such other account in which moneys are accounted for which may be made available for such purpose by the board.

If sufficient moneys are not legally available so as to defray the amount of such deficiency as the respective obligations comprising the cost of the project become due, the urban district shall budget, appropriate, and levy taxes therefor, subject to the limitation pertaining to capital improvements in section 32-11-217 (1)(d).

If a greater amount of assessments has been collected than was necessary to defray the cost of the project of any improvement district to which the assessments pertain, the excess shall be transferred to the special surplus and deficiency fund of the urban district as provided in section 32-11-628.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 803, § 160.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-21-160.

32-11-648. Notice of assessment or installment due.

Each county treasurer to whom an assessment roll is transmitted pursuant to section 32-11-641 shall give notice by mail and by publication of the levy of the assessments against the assessable property in the county, of the fact they are payable, and of the last day for their payment, as provided in section 32-11-642 (1).

Each such county treasurer shall give notice by mail and by publication of such installment of such assessments which is payable and of the last day for its payment, as provided in section 32-11-644 and in the assessment resolution.

Each such notice given by the county treasurer shall:

State the amount of the assessment or of the installment due, except in the case of any published notice;

State how unpaid principal is payable in installments; and

State the place of payment and the time for it to close.

The failure of the county treasurer to give notice or to do any other act or thing required by this section shall not affect the assessment or any installment thereof.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 803, § 161.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-21-161.

32-11-649. When collections paid district.

All collections made by the county treasurer upon each assessment roll in any calendar month shall be accounted for and paid over to the district treasurer on or before the tenth day of the next succeeding calendar month, with separate statements for all such collections for each improvement district.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 804, § 162.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-21-162.

32-11-650. Collections by county treasurer.

The county treasurer shall receive payment of all assessments against assessable property located in the county appearing upon the assessment roll, with interest.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 804, § 163.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-21-163.

32-11-651. Collection of delinquent assessments.

As soon as any assessment or any installment thereof pertaining to any improvement district becomes in default, the county treasurer shall mark the same delinquent on the assessment roll, together with the amount of unpaid principal shown on the assessment roll and accrued interest thereon to the date of delinquency, and the county treasurer shall within thirty days after such delinquency certify such amounts as shown thereon to the board of the urban district.

The county treasurer shall collect the delinquent assessment, or the delinquent installment and all other unpaid installments of the assessment, if any, and accrued interest, all penalties, and costs of collection accrued, in accordance with section 32-11-643 and other provisions in this article supplemental thereto, in the same manner and with the same interest and penalties thereon as other taxes collected by the county treasurer on behalf of the urban district. All of the laws of the state for the assessment and collection of general taxes, including the laws for the sale of real property for taxes and redemption therefrom, shall be applicable to and shall have the same effect with respect to the collection of such assessments.

If the board elects by resolution to have the urban district foreclose the lien on any assessable property and secure the payment of any delinquent assessment or delinquent installment thereof as provided in part 11 of article 25 of title 31, C.R.S., the secretary shall notify each county treasurer to whom there has been transmitted an assessment roll pertaining to such delinquent assessments and installments of such election and shall transmit thereto a copy of such resolution. Thereupon the county treasurer shall take no further action unless the board causes him to be informed subsequently that the owner of any tract has been restored the right to pay in installments in accordance with section 32-11-643 (2) and other provisions in this article supplemental thereto.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 804, § 164.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-21-164.

L. 81:

(3) amended, p. 1626, § 37, effective July 1.

Cross references:

For collection of taxes, see article 10 of title 39; for the sale of tax liens, see article 11 of title 39; for redemptions, see article 12 of title 39.

32-11-652. Optional filing of claim of lien.

The board may, but is not required, in any assessment resolution or in any resolution supplemental thereto, provide that the secretary, within thirty days after the expiration of the thirty-day payment period specified in section 32-11-642, shall make out, sign, attest with the seal of the urban district, and file for record in the office of the county clerk of each county in which is located assessable property pertaining to any improvement district, a claim of lien for the unpaid amount due and assessed against each tract on the assessment roll for the improvement district.

When a claim of lien is so filed and any assessment pertaining thereto is paid in full, the secretary shall release the lien against any specific tract either by entering and signing a receipt of payment upon the margin of the record thereof or by filing for record in the office of the county clerk and recorder a separate release wherein payment of the assessment, principal, interest, and any penalty is recited.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 804, § 165.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-21-165.

32-11-653. Duties imposed when assessments are levied.

Whenever the board has provided for any project under this article, has levied assessments therefor, and has issued assessment bonds or assessment debentures or both such types of securities for the financing of the same, then and in such event there shall be imposed upon the urban district the following additional duties:

The district shall act as the agency for the collection of such assessments and in so doing shall act as trustees for the benefit of such holders of assessment debentures or bonds.

If the board creates more than one improvement district, the funds of each such district shall be kept in a separate fund or account to be used for the payment of interest and principal of the assessment securities pertaining to the improvement district.

The urban district shall prepare annually and shall make available for inspection in the district treasurer's office to each holder of assessment securities a statement of the financial condition of the improvement district relating to such securities, which report shall include a statement of all delinquencies existing at such time.

Where there is a delinquency continuing for a period of one year in the payment of any installment of such assessment made for the project, the urban district shall thereafter forthwith proceed with the institution of proceedings to foreclose the assessment lien against the property or properties wherein the delinquency exists, unless the county treasurer has instituted such proceedings, as provided in this article.

The holder of any assessment security issued under this article or any trustee therefor has the right to institute such foreclosure proceedings in the name of the urban district issuing such security, if such a delinquency has continued for a period of one and one-half years and if the urban district has not theretofore instituted such foreclosure proceedings. The failure of any holder of any assessment security or any trustee therefor so to proceed shall not be deemed a waiver of any other right or privilege and shall not relieve the urban district or any of its officers, agents, or employees of any liability for failure to perform any duty.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 805, § 166.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-21-166.

32-11-654. Procedure to place omitted tracts on roll.

Whenever by mistake or inadvertence or for any cause any tract otherwise subject to assessment within any improvement district has been omitted from the assessment roll for any project, the board may, upon its own motion or upon the application of any owner of any tract within such district charged with the lien of an assessment for the project, assess the same in accordance with the special benefits accruing to such omitted tract by reason of such project and in proportion to the assessments levied upon other tracts in such district.

In any such case the board shall first pass a resolution setting forth that certain tracts therein described were omitted from such assessment, and notifying all persons who may desire to object thereto to appear at a meeting of the board at a time specified in such resolution to present their objection thereto and directing the engineer to report to the board at or prior to the date fixed for such hearing the amount which should be borne by each such tract so omitted, which resolution shall be published at least once by the secretary in a newspaper of general circulation in the improvement district and shall be thereby mailed to the last known owner of each such tract.

At the conclusion of such hearing or any adjournment thereof, the board shall consider the matter as though each such tract had been included upon the original roll and may confirm the same or any portion thereof by resolution.

Thereupon the assessment on such roll of each omitted tract shall be collected, the payment of which shall be secured by an assessment lien; and a claim of lien therefor may be filed for record in the office of the county clerk as other assessments, as provided in section 32-11-652.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 805, § 167.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-21-167.

32-11-655. Irregularities in contracts and assessments.

Whenever the board makes any contract pertaining to any project provided in this article or makes any assessment against any tract within any improvement district for any project authorized in this article and, in making such contract or assessment, acts in good faith and without fraud, each such contract and assessment shall be valid and enforceable as such, and the assessment shall be a lien upon the tract upon which the same purports to be a lien.

It shall be no objection to the validity of such contract, assessment, or lien that:

The contract for such project was not awarded in the manner or at the time required hereby, or otherwise;

The contract was made by an unauthorized officer or person if the same has been confirmed by the authorities of the urban district; and

The assessment is based upon an improper basis of benefits to the tract within the improvement district, unless it appears that the urban district authorities acted fraudulently or oppressively in making such assessment.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 806, § 168.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-21-168.

32-11-656. Owner of interest may pay share.

The owner of any divided or undivided interest in any tract assessed under this article may pay his share of any assessment, upon producing evidence of the extent of his interest satisfactory to the county treasurer having the roll in charge.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 806, § 169.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-21-169.

32-11-657. Payment of assessments by joint owner.

Whenever any assessment or installment thereof is paid or any delinquency therefor is redeemed or any judgment therefor is paid by any joint owner of any tract assessed for any project, such joint owner may, after demand and refusal, by an action brought in the district court recover from each of his co-owners the respective amounts of such payment which each such co-owner should bear with interest thereon at ten percent per annum from the date of such payments, and costs of the action.

The joint owner making such payment shall have a lien upon the undivided interest of his co-owners in and to such property from date of such payment.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 806, § 170.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-21-170.

32-11-658. Assessment paid in error.

When, through error or inadvertence, any person pays any assessment or installment thereof upon the tract of another, such payer may, after demand and refusal, by an action in the district court recover from the owner of such tract the amount so paid and costs of the action.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 807, § 171.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-21-171.

32-11-659. Description of property - notice to transferees.

It is sufficient in any case to describe the tract as the same is platted or recorded or described in any official record, although the same belongs to several persons.

Any purchaser, lienholder, assignee, or transferee of any tract subject to assessment as provided in this article, in any improvement district provided for in this article, after the first publication of the notice of the provisional order to create such district, shall be held to notice thereof and of all proceedings with reference thereto the same as the owners of such tract at the time of such notice or proceedings.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 807, § 172.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-21-172.

32-11-660. Assessment of public property.

When the urban district, any public body, or the federal government (except the federal government in the absence of its consent by congress to assessment) owns any tract or holds the title to any tract not used as a street or other public right-of-way of the urban district or other public body, which if owned by a private person would be liable to assessment for benefits to pay for any project mentioned in this article, an assessment shall be made against such tract as though such tract were the property of a private person.

The urban district, the public body, or the federal government, in the case of such consent, shall pay the amount of each such assessment by the levy of taxes or from other funds available therefor.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 807, § 173.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-21-173.

32-11-661. Collecting assessments against public properties.

If any assessment against any tract of a private person operating a public utility or any tract of the urban district, any public body, or the federal government is not paid as provided by law, suit may be brought in the proper district court to enforce the collection of the assessment, and the judgment rendered against any such owner of the tract shall be enforced as are other judgments.

No such tract owned thereby shall be sold under any such judgment, nor as the result of any foreclosure of an assessment, nor otherwise.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 807, § 174.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-21-174.

32-11-662. Sewer districts and subdistricts.

The urban district may establish and maintain separate or combined sewer systems, which systems shall be divided into improvement district and subdistrict sewers for storm drainage, upon initiation by the board.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 807, § 175.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-21-175.